Utah statutes.
67-1a-12.   Authority to administer oaths.

The lieutenant governor and personnel employed under Section 67-1a-3, who are designated by the lieutenant governor, may administer oaths when necessary in the performance of official duties.



Enacted by Chapter 5, 2008 General Session

